Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5963.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1821. (1) No An officer of the senate or house of representatives is liable to exempt from arrest on civil process while in actual attendance upon on the duties of his the office. (2) No female shall be imprisoned on any process in any civil action. (2) (3) No minor An individual who is under 16 years of age shall may not be imprisoned on any process in any a civil action. (3) (4) All parties, attorneys, and A party, an attorney, or a subpoenaed witnesses are witness is exempt from arrest on civil process while going to, attending, and returning from the places they are place the party, attorney, or witness is required to attend. (4) (5) No person while he An individual who is within in this state pursuant to any in accordance with a subpoena issued to compel his the individual's appearance in any a criminal proceeding pending in this state shall may not be arrested or detained upon any on a criminal charge for any an offense committed prior to his before the individual's entry into this state pursuant to in accordance with the subpoena. (5) (6) No person An individual who is passing through this state while going to another state in obedience to a summons to attend and testify in a criminal proceeding in that state or while returning from that state shall may not be arrested, by either civil or criminal arrest, for any matter which that arose before his the individual's entry into this state in obedience to that summons. (6) (7) No An officer of any of the several courts a court of record, including jurors, shall a juror, may not be arrested on any civil process while going to, attending, or returning from any an actual sitting of the court of which he the individual is an officer. In other cases these officers are liable to arrest and may be held to bail in the same manner as other persons.individuals. (7) (8) Every A civil arrest made contrary to the above provisions subsections (1) through (7) to (6) is void and a contempt of court. The court or officer before whom any a witness is subpoenaed to attend, and every a justice of the supreme court, and every or a circuit court judge has authority to may discharge any person arrested contrary to those provisions subsections (1) through (7).to (6). (8) (9) Every A person making or procuring that makes or procures a civil arrest contrary to the above provisions subsections (1) through (7) to (6) is guilty of contempt of court and is liable to the person individual arrested in double the amount of damages which that a jury finds that he the arrested individual has sustained and also is liable in an action at the suit of any injured person brought by the arrested individual for the loss, hindrance, and damage the injured person arrested individual has sustained in consequence of the arrest. The officer or person causing the arrest shall is not be guilty of contempt nor or liable for damages if the person individual exempt from arrest has failed to mention that he the individual is exempt or, after mentioning that he the individual is exempt, refused the officer's request to sign an affidavit swearing that at the time of his the arrest he was either:the individual was 1 or more of the following: (a) an An officer of the senate or house of representatives in actual attendance upon on the duties of his the office. , or (b) a female, or (b) (c) a minor under Under 16 years of age. , or (c) (d) a A party, an attorney, or a subpoenaed witness going to, attending, or returning from a place he the party, attorney, or witness was required to attend. , or (d) (e) a person An individual who was passing through this state while going to or returning from another state to which he the individual had been summoned to attend and testify in a criminal prosecution. , or (e) (f) an An officer of a court of record going to, attending, or returning from an actual sitting of the court. Any civil arrest made contrary to the above provisions (1) through (7) is void.